Utah statutes.
77-38-5.   Application to felonies and misdemeanors of the declaration of the rights of crime victims.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to:

(1)  any felony filed in the courts of the state;

(2)  to any class A and class B misdemeanor filed in the courts of the state; and

(3)  to cases in the juvenile court as provided in Section 78A-6-114.

